District of Columbia statutes.
19-907

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Uniform Act [this chapter], consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to the subject matter among states enacting it.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 402(b), 48 DCR 2087

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act.